District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.03

Purpose of the Department.

The Department shall:

(1)

Maximize the well-being and quality of life for eligible low-income individuals and other populations through the provision of leadership and direction in administering responsive, effective, and efficient health-care benefits;

(2)

Develop a comprehensive, efficient, and cost-effective health-care system for the District’s uninsured, under-insured, and low-income residents;

(3)

Develop eligibility, service coverage, and service delivery and reimbursement policies for the District’s health-care-financing programs that ensure improved access and efficient delivery of service;

(4)

Ensure that District health-care programs maximize available federal financial assistance; and

(5)

Support the health-care policy, delivery, and access initiatives of the Department of Health and other District agencies through sound health-care financing.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 4, 55 DCR 216

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-771.04, § 7-771.07, and § 7-771.09.